Illinois, session 104th, HB3756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Benefits Exchange Law is 5amended by adding Section 5-11 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 122/5-11 new)7    Sec. 5-11. Easy enrollment special enrollment period.8    (a) The Illinois Health Benefits Exchange shall allow a 9special enrollment period for an uninsured taxpayer and the 10uninsured taxpayer's qualified dependents, if applicable, if 11(1) the uninsured taxpayer requested health insurance benefit 12information through the easy enrollment program under Section 13513 of the Illinois Income Tax Act and (2) the uninsured 14taxpayer and the uninsured taxpayer's qualified dependents, if 15applicable, are eligible to enroll in a qualified health plan 16through the Illinois Health Benefits Exchange.17    (b) The Illinois Health Benefits Exchange shall notify an 18interested, uninsured taxpayer by letter of the estimated 19eligibility for insurance affordability programs, including 20Medicaid, federal health insurance premium tax credits, and 21cost-sharing reductions.22    (c) The uninsured taxpayer and the uninsured taxpayer's 23dependents shall have 60 days from the date of the letter to   HB3756 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08381 BAB 18432 b1select and enroll in a qualified health plan.2    (d) After an eligible individual and the eligible 3individual's dependents have selected and enrolled in a 4qualified health plan, coverage shall be effective the first 5day of the month that follows the plan selection.6    (e) The Department of Insurance and the Department of 7Healthcare and Family Services may adopt any rules necessary 8to implement an easy enrollment special enrollment period. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.